Nevada, session 83, SB91.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 440 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the name of a person includes a diacritical mark, the
State Registrar and each county health officer may record the
diacritical mark in the vital statistics of the State Registrar or
county health officer, as applicable.
2. As used in this section, “diacritical mark” means a mark in
Latin script that is added or attached to a letter to indicate the
pronunciation of the letter or word. The term includes, without
limitation, accents, tildes, graves, umlauts and cedillas.
Sec. 2. Chapter 483 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the full legal name of an applicant for a license, a
commercial driver’s license, an identification card or a driver
authorization card includes a diacritical mark, the Department
may record the diacritical mark in the records of the Department
and display the mark on any license, identification card or driver
authorization card issued by the Department.
2. As used in this section, “diacritical mark” means a mark in
Latin script that is added or attached to a letter to indicate the
pronunciation of the letter or word. The term includes, without
limitation, accents, tildes, graves, umlauts and cedillas.
Sec. 3. NRS 483.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.015 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.330 [,] and
section 2 of this act, the provisions of NRS 483.010 to 483.630,
-
*SB91_R2*

– 3 –
inclusive, and section 2 of this act, apply only with respect to
noncommercial drivers’ licenses.
Sec. 4. NRS 483.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.020 As used in NRS 483.010 to 483.630, inclusive, and
section 2 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 483.030 to 483.190, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. Chapter 486 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the full legal name of an applicant for a motorcycle
driver’s license includes a diacritical mark, the Department may
record the diacritical mark in the records of the Department and
display the mark on any motorcycle driver’s license issued by the
Department.
2. As used in this section, “diacritical mark” means a mark in
Latin script that is added or attached to a letter to indicate the
pronunciation of the letter or word. The term includes, without
limitation, accents, tildes, graves, umlauts and cedillas.
Sec. 6. NRS 486.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
486.011 As used in NRS 486.011 to 486.381, inclusive, and
section 5 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 486.015 to 486.057, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7.5. As soon as practicable after determining that the
Department of Motor Vehicles has sufficient funding from the
Federal Government to carry out the provisions of sections 2 and 5
of this act, the Director of the Department shall notify the Governor
and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau of the fact and
shall publish notice to the public of the fact on the Internet website
of the Department.
Sec. 8. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 2 to 7.5, inclusive, of this act become effective on
the later of:
(a) The date on which the United States Social Security
Administration authorizes the recording and display of diacritical
marks on documents of the Social Security Administration; or
(b) The date on which the Director of the Department of Motor
Vehicles notifies the Governor and the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau that the Department has sufficient funding from the
Federal Government to carry out the provisions of sections 2 and 5
of this act.
-
*SB91_R2*

– 4 –
3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective 6 months after the
date on which sections 2 to 7.5, inclusive, of this act become
effective pursuant to subsection 2.
H
-
*SB91_R2*